Utah statutes.
7-1-303.   Joint operations and information exchange by institutions.

The commissioner may authorize institutions subject to the jurisdiction of the department to engage in such joint and cooperative actions as the commissioner finds will be in the public interest, including:

(1)  mutual exchange of financial information as to depositors, borrowers, and other customers;

(2)  joint use of facilities;

(3)  joint operation of clearing houses and other facilities for payment of checks, drafts, or other instruments drawn on or issued by various classes of depository institutions;

(4)  joint participation in lending programs to promote the public welfare;

(5)  joint risk management services; and

(6)  joint ownership, operation, or furnishing of electronic funds transfer services.

